Utah statutes.
61-2-26.   Rulemaking  required for offer or sale of an undivided
fractionalized long-term estate -- Disclosures -- Management agreement.
(1) (a)  A licensee or certificate holder under this chapter who sells or
offers to sell an undivided fractionalized long-term estate shall comply with
the disclosure requirements imposed by rules made by the commission under this
section.
(b)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the commission shall make rules as to the timing, form, and substance of
disclosures required to be made by a licensee or certificate holder under this
section.
(2)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the commission shall make rules imposing requirements for a management
agreement related to an undivided fractionalized long-term estate that makes
the offer or sale of the undivided fractionalized long-term estate treated as
a real estate transaction and not treated as an offer or sale of a security
under Chapter 1, Utah Uniform Securities Act.
(3)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the commission shall make rules establishing:
(a)  the disclosures required in the sale or offer of an undivided
fractionalized long-term estate that is subject to a master lease;
(b)  requirements for the management of a master lease on an undivided
fractionalized long-term estate; and
(c)  the requirements on the structure of a master lease on an undivided
fractionalized long-term estate.
